District of Columbia statutes.
29-1205.01

Management of statutory trust.

The activities and affairs of a statutory trust shall be managed by or under the authority of its trustees.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(l)(6)(A), 59 DCR 13171
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “activities” for “business.”

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 501 of the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act.

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.